dev/wikt.full-form.pl.dix
    <pardef n="u/cho__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>cho</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cho</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cha</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>chu</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>chu</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>chem</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cho</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>szy</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>szy</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>szu</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>szom</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>szach</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>szami</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>szy</l><r>cho<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hi/t__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tu</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>towi</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cie</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tem</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cie</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ty</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ty</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tów</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tom</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tach</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tami</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ty</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pusty/nia__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>nia</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nię</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ni</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ni</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ni</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nią</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nio</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ń</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niom</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niach</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niami</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>nia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gram__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spos/ób__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>ób</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ób</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>obu</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>obowi</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>obie</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>obem</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>obie</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oby</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oby</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>obów</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>obom</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>obach</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>obami</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oby</l><r>ób<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aksjomat"><i>aksjoma</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="atrament"><i>atramen</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="banknot"><i>bankno</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="bukiet"><i>bukie</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="chleb"><i>chleb</i><par n="gram__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="einstein"><i>einstein</i><par n="gram__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="gram"><i>gram</i><par n="gram__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="hit"><i>hi</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="kilogram"><i>kilogram</i><par n="gram__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="klarnet"><i>klarne</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="kwadrat"><i>kwadra</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="meczet"><i>mecze</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="młyn"><i>młyn</i><par n="gram__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="obiekt"><i>obiek</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="odbyt"><i>odby</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="ostrosłup"><i>ostrosłup</i><par n="gram__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="przedmiot"><i>przedmio</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="pustynia"><i>pusty</i><par n="pusty/nia__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="samolot"><i>samolo</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="skrót"><i>skró</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="sposób"><i>spos</i><par n="spos/ób__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="szkielet"><i>szkiele</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="sztylet"><i>sztyle</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="ucho"><i>u</i><par n="u/cho__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zenit"><i>zeni</i><par n="hi/t__n_mi"/></e>
